Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4023
Utility facility within district; construct or alter; approval required; when.

All public utilities or private companies having franchises for utilities from the city shall, before constructing any new utility facility valued in excess of five thousand dollars or substantially improving or changing existing facilities within a business improvement district, obtain approval of the mayor and city council after the mayor and city council have obtained written comments from the business improvement board to coordinate the business improvement district plan.

Laws 1979, LB 251, § 9.